Missouri, session 2026, SB1301.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 138, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 138.195, to read as
follows:
138.195. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, in any ratio study in which the commission
evaluates the assessment ratios of the various counties, the
commission shall require that no county's ratio of assessed
values is greater than one.
✓